Nebraska, session 109, LB324.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB324 LB324
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 19-4027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
19-4027 (1) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2) of
this section, whenever Whenever a hearing is held under section 19-4026
or 19-4029, the city council shall:
(a) (1) Hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the
proposed action;
(b) (2) Rule upon all written protests received prior to the close
of the hearing, which ruling shall be final; and
(c) (3) Continue the hearing from time to time as the city council
may deem necessary.
(2)(a) If a special assessment is to be used, proceedings shall
terminate if, after a postcard for voting has been mailed pursuant to
section 19-4029.01 to all written protest is made prior to the close of
the hearing by the record owners of over fifty percent of the assessable
units in the proposed business improvement district, less than fifty
percent of such record owners returning the postcard vote in favor of the
creation of the proposed business improvement district.
(b) If an occupation tax is to be used, proceedings shall terminate
if, after a postcard for voting has been mailed pursuant to section
19-4029.01 to all users of space in the proposed business improvement
district, less than protest is made by users of over fifty percent of
such users of space returning the postcard vote in favor of the creation
of the space in the proposed business improvement district.
Sec. 2. Section 19-4029.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
19-4029.01 (1) At least ten days prior to the date of any hearing
under sections 19-4026, 19-4029, 19-4029.02, and 19-4029.03, notice of
such hearing shall be given by:
(a) One publication of the notice of hearing in a legal newspaper in
or of general circulation in the city;
-2-

LB324 LB324
2025 2025
(b) Mailing a copy of the notice of hearing to each owner of taxable
property in the proposed, modified, or expanded business improvement
district as shown on the latest tax rolls of the county treasurer for
such county along with a self-addressed postcard for voting if a special
assessment is to be imposed. Such postcard may be returned by a record
owner as provided in subdivision (2)(a) of section 19-4027 or subdivision
(2)(a) of section 19-4029.04, whichever is applicable;
(c) Providing a copy of the notice of hearing to any neighborhood
association registered pursuant to subsection (2) of this section in the
manner requested by such neighborhood association; and
(d) If an occupation tax is to be imposed, mailing a copy of the
notice of hearing to each user of space in the proposed, modified, or
expanded business improvement district along with a self-addressed
postcard for voting. Such postcard may be returned by a user of space as
provided in subdivision (2)(b) of section 19-4027 or subdivision (2)(b)
of section 19-4029.04, whichever is applicable.
(2) The notice required by subdivision (1)(c) of this section shall
be provided to any neighborhood association which is registered pursuant
to this subsection and whose area of representation is located, in whole
or in part, within a one-mile radius of the existing or proposed,
modified, or expanded boundaries of the business improvement district.
Each neighborhood association desiring to receive such notice shall
register with the city the area of representation of such association and
provide the name of and contact information for the individual designated
to receive notice on behalf of such association and the requested manner
of service, whether by email or first-class or certified mail. The
registration shall be in accordance with any rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the city.
(3) Any notice of hearing for any hearing required by sections
19-4026 and 19-4029 shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the boundaries of the proposed business
-3-

LB324 LB324
2025 2025
improvement district;
(b) The time and place of a hearing to be held by the city council
to consider establishment of the business improvement district;
(c) The proposed public facilities and improvements to be made or
maintained within any business improvement district; and
(d) The proposed or estimated costs for improvements and facilities
within the proposed business improvement district and the method by which
the revenue shall be raised. If a special assessment is proposed, the
notice shall also state the proposed method of assessment.
(4) Any notice of hearing for any hearing required by sections
19-4029.02 and 19-4029.03 shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the boundaries of the area to be added to or
removed from the existing business improvement district and a description
of the new boundaries of the modified business improvement district;
(b) The time and place of a hearing to be held by the city council
to consider establishment of the modified business improvement district;
(c) The new public facilities and improvements, if any, to be made
or maintained within any business improvement district; and
(d) The proposed or estimated costs for new and existing
improvements and facilities within the proposed, modified, or expanded
business improvement district and the method by which the revenue shall
be raised. If a special assessment is proposed, the notice shall also
state the proposed method of assessment.
Sec. 3. Section 19-4029.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
19-4029.04 (1) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2) of
this section, whenever Whenever a hearing is held to change the
boundaries or the functions or ordinance provisions of an existing
business improvement district under section 19-4029.02 or 19-4029.03, the
city council shall:
(a) (1) Hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the
-4-

LB324 LB324
2025 2025
proposed action;
(b) (2) Rule upon all written protests received prior to the close
of the hearing, which ruling shall be final; and
(c) (3) Continue the hearing from time to time as the city council
may deem necessary.
(2)(a) If a special assessment is to be used, proceedings shall
terminate if, after a postcard for voting has been mailed pursuant to
section 19-4029.01 to all written protest is made prior to the close of
the hearing by the record owners of over fifty percent of the assessable
units in the modified business improvement district as proposed, less
than fifty percent of such record owners returning the postcard vote in
favor of the modified business improvement district as proposed.
(b) If an occupation tax is to be used, proceedings shall terminate
if, after a postcard for voting has been mailed pursuant to section
19-4029.01 to all users of space in the modified business improvement
district as proposed, less than protest is made by users of over fifty
percent of such users of space returning the postcard vote in favor of in
the modified business improvement district as proposed.
Sec. 4. Original sections 19-4027, 19-4029.01, and 19-4029.04,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-